tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Çim ve Bahçe > Ev Dışında Yaşam > Pencere ve Kapı Tentesi Aksesuarları: Tente Kolları; Tente Motorları; Tente Sabitleme Kitleri; Askı Klipleri; Mesh Paneller; Pol halkaları; Çekme Çubukları; Çekme Kayışları; Çatı Kaplamaları; Yan Duvarlar; Saklama Çantaları; Yapısal Çerçeveler
nl: Huis en tuin > Tuin en gazon > Buitenleven > Accessoires voor zonwering voor ramen en deuren: Armen voor zonwering voor ramen en deuren; Luifelmotoren; Bevestigingssets voor luifels; Ophangklemmen; Gaaspanelen; Magneetringen; Trekstangen; Trekriemen; Dakbekledingen; Zijwanden; Tassen voor opslag; Structurele lijsten
vi: Nhà và vườn > Bãi cỏ và vườn > Cuộc sống ngoài trời > Phụ kiện mái hiên: Cần mái hiên; Động cơ mái che; Bộ dây neo chống gió cho mái che; Kẹp móc; Tấm lưới; Vòng cột; Cần kéo; Đai kéo; Tấm lót mái; Tường bên; Túi bảo quản; Khung kết cấu
ru: Дом и сад > Товары для придомовых и садовых участков > Отдых на открытом воздухе > Аксессуары для маркиз: Кронштейны для маркиз; Моторы для навесов; Комплект крепежных элементов для тента; Зажимы-крючки; Сетчатые стенки; Кольца для опор; Штанги для раскладывания; Ремни для раскладывания; Внутренние тенты под крышу; Боковые стенки; Сумки и чехлы для хранения; Несущие каркасы
pl: Dom i ogród > Trawnik i ogród > Akcesoria ogrodowe > Akcesoria do markiz: Ramiona markizy; Silniki do markiz; Zestawy mocujące do markiz; Klipsy do wieszaków; Panele siatkowe; Kółka do karniszy; Kanisze; Paski ściągające; Okładziny dachowe; Ściany boczne; Torby; Ramy konstrukcyjne
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Морава и градина > Живот на открито > Аксесоари за тенти: Рамена за тенти; Мотори за тенти; Комплекти за закрепване/обтягане на сенници; Щипки; Мрежести панели; Халки за прътове; Водачи; Ремъци за издърпване; Подплати за покрива; Странични стени; Чанти за съхранение; Структурни рамки
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Travnjak i vrt > Boravak na otvorenom > Pribor za tende: Krakovi za tende; Motori za tende; Kompleti za pričvršćivanje tendi; Kopče za vješanje; Mrežasti paneli; Stupni prstenovi; Vučne šipke; Vučno remenje; Krovne obloge; Bočni zidovi; Vreće za pohranu; Strukturni okviri
nb: Hjem og hage > Plen og hage > Leve ute > Tilbehør til fortelt: Markisearmer; Markisemotorer; Markisefester; Hengeklips; Nettpaneler; Polringer; Trekkstenger; Trekkstropper; Takforinger; Sidevegger; Oppbevaringsposer; Strukturelle rammer
sv: Hem och trädgård > Gräsmatta och trädgård > Utomhusliv > Markistillbehör: Markisarmar; Markismotorer; Markisförankringssatser; Hängklämmor; Nätpaneler; Stångringar; Dragstänger; Dragremmar; Takfoder; Sidoväggar; Förvaringsväskor; Strukturella ramar
hu: Otthon és kert > Gyep és kert > Kültéri élet > Napellenző-kiegészítők: Napellenző karok; Napellenző motorok; Napellenző megkötő készlet / csomag; Akasztóklipek; Hálós panelek; Oszlopgyűrűk; Húzórudak; Húzópántok; Tetőburkolatok; Oldalfalak; Tárolótáskák; Strukturális keretek
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Veja ir sodas > Gyvenimas lauke > Markizių priedai: Markizių skersiniai; Markizių varikliai; Markizių tvirtinimo rinkiniai; Pakabinimo segtukai; Tinkleliai; Stulpų žiedai; Traukimo strypai; Traukimo diržai; Stogo apmušalai; Šoninės sienelės; Sandėliavimo krepšiai; Struktūriniai rėmai
fr: Maison et jardin > Pelouses et jardins > Vie en extérieur > Accessoires pour stores extérieurs: Bras d’auvent; Moteurs pour auvents; Kit de fixation pour auvent; Clips de suspension; Panneaux en maille; Anneaux de poteaux; Tiges de traction; Sangles de traction; Doublures de toit; Parois latérales; Sacs de rangement; Cadres structurels
en: Home & Garden > Lawn & Garden > Outdoor Living > Awning Accessories: Awning Arms; Awning Motors; Awning Tie Down Kits; Hanger Clips; Mesh Panels; Pole Rings; Pull Rods; Pull Straps; Roof Linings; Side Walls; Storage Bags; Structural Frames
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Travnik in vrt > Bivanje na prostem > Dodatki za tende: Ročice za tende; Motorji za ponjave; Kompleti za pritrditev ponjav; Sponke za obešanje; Mrežasti paneli; Objemke za palice; Vlečne palice; Vlečni trakovi; Strešne obloge; Stranske stene; Vreče za shranjevanje; Konstrukcijska ogrodja
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Gazon și grădină > Exterior > Accesorii pentru paravane: Brațe pentru paravane; Motoare pentru marchize; Seturi de ancorare pentru marchize; Cleme pentru agățare; Secțiuni din plasă; Inele pentru stâlpi; Tije pentru tragere; Curele pentru tragere; Inserții acoperiș; Pereți laterali; Genți pentru depozitare; Cadre structurale
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Relva e jardim > Vida ao ar livre > Acessórios para toldos: Braços para toldos; Motores para toldos; Kits de fixação para toldos; Ganchos para toldos; Painéis de rede; Anéis de poste; Hastes para toldos; Correias de fixação; Revestimentos de telhado; Paredes laterais; Sacos de armazenamento; Armações de estrutura
de: Heim & Garten > Rasen & Garten > Garten & Balkon > Markisen-Zubehör: Markisenarme; Markisenmotoren; Markisenbefestigungssets; Bügel-Clips; Gittereinsätze; Mastringe; Zugstangen; Zuggurte; Dacheindeckungen; Seitenwände; Aufbewahrungsbeutel für Markisen; Strukturelle Rahmen
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 草皮和花園 > 戶外生活 > 遮棚配件: 遮陽篷臂; 遮陽蓬馬達; 遮陽蓬固定套件; 衣架夾; 網格板; 桿環; 拉桿; 拉帶; 頂篷襯裡; 側牆; 收納袋; 結構框架
da: Hjem og have > Græsplæne og have > Udendørsliv > Tilbehør til markiser: Markisearme; Markisemotorer; Fastgøringssæt til markiser; Bøjleclips; Meshpaneler; Pæleringe; Markisestænger; Trækstropper; Tagbeklædninger; Sidevægge; Opbevaringsposer; Strukturelle rammer
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Γκαζόν & κήπος > Υπαίθρια διαβίωση > Αξεσουάρ τέντας: Βραχίονες τέντας; Κινητήρες τεντών; Κιτ αγκύρωσης τεντών; Κλιπ κρεμάστρας; Διχτυωτά πάνελ; Δακτύλιοι στύλων; Ράβδοι έλξης; Λουριά έλξης; Επενδύσεις οροφής; Πλευρικοί τοίχοι; Τσάντες αποθήκευσης; Δομικά πλαίσια
cs: Dům a zahrada > Trávníky a zahrady > Bydlení na zahradě > Příslušenství k markýzám: Markýzová ramena; Motory pro markýzy; Sady k upevnění markýz; Závěsné klipy; Panely ze síťoviny; Kroužky na tyče; Táhla; Stahovací popruhy; Střešní krytiny; Boční stěny; Skladovací tašky; Strukturální rámy
it: Casa e giardino > Prato e giardino > Vita all'aperto > Accessori per tende parasole: Bracci della tenda da sole; Motori per tende da sole; Kit di ancoraggio per tenda da sole; Clip per ganci; Pannelli a rete; Occhielli; Aste di tiro; Cinghie di tiro; Rivestimenti del tetto; Pareti laterali; Borse portaoggetti; Telai strutturali
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Piha ja puutarha > Oleskelu ulkona > Markiisitarvikkeet: Markiisivarret; Markiisimoottorit; Markiisien kiinnityssarjat; Ripustinklipsit; Verkkopaneelit; Naparenkaat; Vetotangot; Vetohihnat; Sisäkatot; Sivuseinät; Säilytyspussit; Rakennekehykset
es: Casa y jardín > Jardín > Artículos de exterior > Acessorios para toldos: Brazos para toldos; Motores para toldos; Kit de sujeción para toldos; Clips para colgar; Paneles de malla; Anillos para poste; Varillas de tracción; Correas de tracción; Revestimientos de techo; Paredes laterales; Bolsas de almacenamiento; Marcos estructurales
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 草坪与花园 > 户外生活用品 > 遮阳篷配件: 遮阳篷臂; 遮阳篷电机; 遮阳篷固定套件; 吊架夹; 网格板; 极环; 拉杆; 拉带; 顶部衬里; 侧壁; 收纳袋; 结构框架
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Trávnik a záhrada > Terasa > Príslušenstvo pre markízy: Ramená pre markízy; Motory k markízam; Súpravy na upevnenie markíz; Klipy na zavesenie; Sieťované panely; Stĺpové krúžky; Ťahacie tyče; Ťahacie popruhy; Strešné obloženie; Bočné steny; Úložné vrecia; Trámové konštrukcie
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 잔디/정원 > 야외활동 용품 > 차양 부대용품: 차양 암; 어닝 모터; 어닝 고정 키트; 행거 클립; 메쉬 패널; 폴 링; 폴대; 풀 스트랩; 지붕 안감; 측면 벽; 수납 가방; 프레임
th: บ้านและสวน > สนามและสวน > ชีวิตกลางแจ้ง > อุปกรณ์ของผ้าใบบังแดด: แขนกันสาด; มอเตอร์กันสาด; ชุดยึดกันสาด; คลิปแขวน; แผงตาข่าย; ห่วงสำหรับเสา; แท่งดึง; สายรัดดึง; วัสดุบุหลังคา; ผนังด้านข้าง; ถุงใส่เก็บของ; โครงเหล็ก
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > ガーデン用品・ガーデン機器 > 屋外用家具・エクステリア > 窓・ドア用オーニング関連小物: オーニングアーム; オーニングモーター; オーニング固定用キット; ハンガークリップ; メッシュパネル; ポールリング; プルロッド; プルストラップ; ルーフライニング; サイドウォール; 収納袋; 構造フレーム
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Gramado e jardim > Espaços residenciais externos > Acessórios de toldos para janelas e portas: Braços para toldo; Motores para toldos; Kits de fixação para toldo; Clipes do pendurador; Painéis de malha; Anéis de polo; Hastes de recolha; Tiras de recolha; Forros do toldo; Paredes laterais; Sacos para armazenamento; Quadros estruturais